Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-162
Joint city and school district facility; building commission; accept gifts.

The building commission shall have the power to accept gifts, devises, and bequests of real and personal property to carry out the purposes of sections 17-156 to 17-162 and, to the extent of the powers conferred upon the building commission by sections 17-156 to 17-162, to execute and carry out such conditions as may be annexed to any such gifts, devises, or bequests.

Laws 1953, c. 37, § 7, p. 129;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 50.